Wisconsin, session 2025, SB165.
do enact as follows:SB165,14Section 1. 125.32 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB165,2,55125.32 (3) (a) No premises for which a Class “B” license or permit is issued 6may remain open between the hours of 2 a.m. and 6 a.m., except as provided in this 1paragraph and par. (c). On Saturday and Sunday, the closing hours shall be 2between 2:30 a.m. and 6 a.m. except that, on the Sunday that daylight saving time 3begins as specified in s. 175.095 (2), the closing hours shall be between 3:30 a.m. 4and 6 a.m. On January 1 premises operating under a Class “B” license or permit 5are not required to close.SB165,26Section 2. 125.68 (4) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB165,2,157125.68 (4) (c) 1. Subject to subds. 3. and 6. and s. 125.51 (3r) (a) 3., no 8premises for which a “Class B” license or permit or a “Class C” license has been 9issued may remain open between the hours of 2 a.m. and 6 a.m., except as otherwise 10provided in this subdivision and subd. 4. On January 1 premises operating under a 11“Class B” license or permit are not required to close. On Saturday and Sunday, no 12premises may remain open between 2:30 a.m. and 6 a.m. except that, on the Sunday 13that daylight saving time begins as specified in s. 175.095 (2), no premises may 14remain open between 3:30 a.m. and 6 a.m. This subdivision does not apply to a 15“Class B” license issued to a winery under s. 125.51 (3) (am).SB165,316Section 3. 175.095 of the statutes is repealed.SB165,417Section 4. 990.001 (12) of the statutes is amended to read:SB165,2,1918990.001 (12) Time. When time is referred to, the standard of time as provided 19by s. 175.09 or 175.095, whichever is applicable, is meant.SB165,520Section 5. Effective date.SB165,2,2121(1) This act takes effect on the first January 1 after publication.SB165,2,2222